Nebraska, session 109, LB1200.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1200 LB1200
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Disaster event means an infectious disease outbreak, including,
but not limited, to avian influenza or another zoonotic disease, a
natural disaster, or another event that substantially disrupts normal
operations and public health; and
(b) Industrial integrator means a large corporation that owns and
manages an entire livestock supply chain or animals including poultry,
hogs, and dairy and feeder cattle, and who controls the entire production
process, providing inputs including, but not limited to, feed, veterinary
care, antibiotics, vaccines, and genetics, and who also contracts with
growers who provide land, barns, and labor, effectively managing the
supply chain from farm to market.
(2) An industrial integrator shall develop and submit an annual
disaster mitigation plan to the Department of Health and Human Services
that includes protocols for coordination and communication during a
disaster event. The plan shall identify (a) local health departments, (b)
hospitals, (c) emergency responders, (d) veterinary clinics, (e)
livestock trucking and transportation companies, (f) other confined
livestock or poultry feeding facilities with a high concentration of
animals that may be affected by, or involved in, a coordinated response
to an outbreak within a five mile radius of the facility, and (g) village
or city mayors located within five miles of the outbreak.
(3) Each disaster mitigation plan shall:
(a) Describe how each industrial integrator will notify and
coordinate with the entities described in subsection (2) of this section
in the event of a suspected or confirmed disaster event, including (i)
procedures for reporting exposures, (ii) facilitating public health
monitoring, including monitoring exposed individuals, and (iii)
supporting continuity of care and emergency response if necessary;
(b) Describe how an industrial integrator will acquire, store, and
distribute appropriate personal protective equipment for workers,
-2-

LB1200 LB1200
2026 2026
contractors, and responders who may be exposed during a disaster event;
and
(c) Include (i) measures to prevent and control the spread of the
infectious disease, including protocols to limit unprotected contact with
infected animals or contaminated materials, (ii) procedures for isolating
affected animals with measures developed to avoid wellhead protection
areas and other local drinking water resources, and (iii) strategies to
reduce transmission within and between facilities.
-3-